Nevada, session 83, SB498.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education to expand
undergraduate and graduate nursing programs at institutions within
the Nevada System of Higher Education the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $10,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $10,000,000
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1:
(a) May be used only for operating costs associated with
expanding such undergraduate and graduate nursing programs,
including, without limitation, costs related to faculty, staff and
equipment; and
(b) Must not be used for capital expenditures, including, without
limitation, the construction of new facilities.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 1.3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$2,500,000 for the Nevada State University budget account to
support academic programming at the North Las Vegas site of the
Nevada State University.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 1.5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$1,511,999 for the Western Nevada College budget account for the
renovation of the Aspen Building on the campus of Western Nevada
College.
Sec. 1.7. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
section 1.3 or 1.5 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)